Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 361, O.S.L.
2023 (40 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 904), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 904. The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall have the
following powers, duties, and responsibilities:
1. To administer the provisions of this act or any duty as
directed by statute;
2. To establish an office for the Commission within this state;
Req. No. 11281 Page 1

3. To elect whatever other officers may be necessary to direct
operations of the Commission;
4. To employ or contract for personnel and administrative
support as the Commission deems appropriate to carry out the purpose
and provisions of this act, including but not limited to a nonprofit
corporation to carry out the Commission's objectives, an Executive
Director or other chief executive officer and any other employees or
contractors the Commission deems appropriate, and to prescribe their
duties and fix their compensation;
5. To administer the Workforce Coordination Revolving Fund
created in Section 255.4 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. To approve or disapprove the budget of the Commission;
7. To promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this act;
8. To enter into contracts or agreements for studies,
professional services, grant administration and procurement,
research projects, supplies, or any other services the Commission
deems necessary to carry out its purpose, and to incur those
expenses necessary to carry out those purposes;
9. To cooperate with any private, local, state, or national
commission, organization, agency, or group and to make contracts and
agreements for joint programs beneficial to Oklahoma's workforce
development efforts;
10. To accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from
any public or private source and deposit such in the Workforce
Req. No. 11281 Page 2

Coor dination Revolving Fund, created in Section 255.4 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. To oversee and direct to the extent permitted by law the
activities and administration of the Governor's Council for
Workforce and Economic Development, including but not limited to the
creation and submission of state plans to the federal government
pursuant to the provisions of the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act;
12. To collect data from federal, state, and local agencies,
departments, educational institutions, boards, commissions, or any
other entities including, but not limited to:
a. number of participants in workforce development
programming,
b. cost per participant,
c. wages before and after participation in programs,
d. degree or certificate conferred on each participant,
e. number of jobs open needing degrees or certificates,
f. labor force and economic information, and
g. any other information the Commission deems appropriate
to guide funding decisions, facilitate its work or the
work of workforce development entities in the state,
or to understand the impact of the state's workforce
efforts and programming;

Req. No. 11281 Page 3

13. To create and maintain a public dashboard and create
reports with data concerning workforce development efforts in the
state. All state and local agencies, departments, educational
institutions, boards, commissions, and other public entities shall
cooperate with information and data requests from the Commission or
its designees. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
Oklahoma Workforce Commission serve as the centralized data and
information repository for workforce development activities for the
state; and
14. To make recommendations to the Legislature to improve
workforce development programs in the state; and
15. To administer the Oklahoma Registered Apprenticeship
Program (ORAP) with a focus on developing, registering, and
monitoring apprenticeships statewide.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 910 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Registered Apprenticeship Program (ORAP) is hereby
established and is subject to the provisions under this act. This
act seeks to modernize and expand apprenticeship opportunities
across Oklahoma, aligning with federal and state workforce goals,
while fostering inclusion, equity, and economic growth.


Req. No. 11281 Page 4

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 911 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, unless used in a context that
clearly requires a different meaning, the term:
1. "Apprenticeship" or "apprenticeship program" means an
apprenticeship program registered under the federal National
Apprenticeship Act, 29 U.S.C., Section 50 et seq., or another
federal apprenticeship program administered by the United States
Department of Labor's Office of Apprenticeship;
2. "Associate of applied science degree" means an associate-
level college degree with a focus on a particular applied science or
technical skill designed for students planning to enter the
workforce upon degree completion;
3. "Eligible course" means any class or program of instruction
offered at a public community and technical college for which the
eligible student receives credit toward the general education
requirements that lead to an associate of applied science degree.
Applied academics for adult education instruction, developmental
education, physical education courses, and recreation and leisure
studies courses are not eligible courses for purposes of this
program;
4. "Eligible student" means any person who has graduated from
high school or has obtained a general equivalency diploma or other
Req. No. 11281 Page 5

appr oved equivalency-based test, is eighteen (18) years of age or
older, and is an apprentice or participating in an apprenticeship
program as verified by the registered apprenticeship program who
registers to participate in the program. Eligible student also
includes journeyworkers who have received a certificate recognized
by the United States Department of Labor; and
5. "Student-apprentice" means a student who has been accepted
into and is participating in the program created in this section.
B. Under the supervision of the Oklahoma Workforce Commission,
the Chancellor shall establish the ORAP program whereby the state's
public community and technical colleges may offer general education
courses to eligible students in a manner and on a timeline that will
allow the eligible student to earn at least fifteen (15) credit
hours of general education courses toward an associate of applied
science degree.
1. To be eligible for the ORAP program, an individual must be
enrolled in an apprenticeship program recognized by the United
States Department of Labor's Office of Apprenticeship or must have
received a United States Department of Labor Certificate of
Completion of Apprenticeship.
2. An apprentice or journeyworker may apply for enrollment in
the ORAP program at the next available program offering.
3. Student-apprentices shall complete and pass all general
education coursework within six (6) years from the initial date of
Req. No. 11281 Page 6

enro llment in the ORAP program or within two (2) years after
completing the apprentice program, whichever is longer.
Journeyworkers shall complete and pass all general education
coursework within six (6) years from the initial date of enrollment.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 912 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For employers to be eligible under Oklahoma Registered
Apprenticeship Program (ORAP), the employer must:
1. Register apprenticeships with the Oklahoma Workforce
Commission and submit detailed workplans;
2. Establish a wage schedule and benefits based on skill level;
and
3. Ensure apprenticeships are accessible and inclusive to
underrepresented groups.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 913 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Per Section 904 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the
Oklahoma Workforce Commission has the following duties:
1. Serve as the coordinating body for apprenticeship programs
and ensure alignment with the state's economic priorities;
2. Collect data on apprenticeship participation, completion
rates, and economic outcomes;
Req. No. 11281 Page 7

3. Maintain a public dashboard to tract program metrics and
promote transparency; and
4. Create and maintain the Oklahoma Apprenticeship Grant Fund.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 914 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Funding for ORAP is established under the Oklahoma Workforce
Commission to cover tuition, tools, and other necessary resources to
ensure success in apprenticeships.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.901 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Qualified employer" means any lawful business entity that
is authorized to participate in an apprenticeship program; and
2. "Qualified apprentice" means a person enrolled in secondary
or postsecondary Career and Technical Education (CTE) programs.
B. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there
shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to
Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount of:
1. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each
qualified employer participating in a qualified apprenticeship
program; and

Req. No. 11281 Page 8

2. Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each qualified
apprentice.
C. The tax credit authorized by this section may not be used to
reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero
(0).
D. To the extent not used, the tax credit authorized by this
section may be carried over, in order, to each of the five (5)
succeeding tax years.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11281 TKR 01/16/25













Req. No. 11281 Page 9